South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S118.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 11, Title 9 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 9-11-95. (A) The earnings limitation imposed pursuant to Section 9-11-90(4) does not apply to a retired police officer certified pursuant to Section 23-23-70 who maintains his constable certification during his retirement and who is hired by a law enforcement agency in his capacity as a constable. (B) A police officer who qualifies for the exemption contained in subsection (A) who is hired by a law enforcement agency is subject to the direction and control of the head of the agency who hired him and must be paid by the agency who hired him. (C) A police officer who qualifies for the exemption contained in subsection (A) may be simultaneously employed by more than one law enforcement agency. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----